Hawaii statutes.
§88-165 Adjustments of pensions. The
board of trustees shall have full authority, within the limits set down in this
part, to review all pensions previously granted or which are hereafter granted
under this part and make adjustments considered fair, reasonable, or necessary.
[L 1939, c 86, pt of §3; RL 1945, pt of §6173; RL 1955, §6-145; HRS §88-165]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next